Utah statutes.
53A-3-424.   Rulemaking -- Reporting.

The State Office of Education may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, regarding compliance standards and reporting requirements for local school boards with respect to the policy required by Section 53A-3-422.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

